Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.100

Health carrier contract with athletic trainer not required.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to require that a health carrier defined in RCW 48.43.005 contract with a person licensed as an athletic trainer under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 253 s 11.]